Oklahoma, session 2026, SB560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1705.7 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No turnpike project or route, nor any extension of an


existing turnpike, shall be authorized unless the Legislature shall


receive, prior to such authorization, results of a special election


from among property owners whose land is situated within a one-mile


radius of the proposed turnpike route. Authorization shall be


allowed only if the majority of landowners along the proposed


turnpike route vote in the affirmative.

Req. No. 1569 Page 1


B. The question at the special election shall be whether a


majority of such affected landowners are in favor of or against the


proposed turnpike route. Such special election is to be organized


and conducted by the county election board in each county where the


property of each affected landowner is located. Notice of such


election shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general


circulation in the county or counties in which the proposed route is


located once a week for the three (3) consecutive weeks preceding


the date of such election, and by posting such notice in three


public places in such county or counties for at least twenty (20)


days prior to the date of such election. If more than four (4)


years elapse from the time that a vote takes place prior to a


project’s or a route’s legislative authorization, the prior vote


shall be presumptively considered to have lapsed and a new special


election in line with the above criteria must be held prior to any


legislative authorization for the construction of any such turnpike


or turnpike extension.


C. For purposes of counting votes in such special election, in


instances where fee simple title of an affected parcel of land is


held in co-tenancy or in joint tenancy, any one of the owners may


vote, but, in order for such vote to be given effect, it shall be


necessary for the representative or representatives of such


landowner to present to the county election board proxies or other


reliable form of proof as shall be developed by the State Election

Req. No. 1569 Page 2


Board and made available through all county election boards for use


by all prospectively eligible voters.


D. Acceptable proof shall include recorded deeds and other


instruments of conveyance, recorded memoranda of trusts, final


probate and divorce decrees, affidavits of surviving joint tenants,


and affidavits of heirship. Where fee simple title is held by a


married couple, either one of the two persons comprising such


married couple shall be empowered to exercise the right to vote


relative to the affected parcel of land. A landowner who,


subsequent to the first official publication of notice of such vote,


creates two or more separate tracts from a single parcel of land and


retains ownership of the separate tracts shall only have one vote.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1569 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:38:46 AM



















Req. No. 1569 Page 3